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DI3CQ-16

DTC P0500/42 | Vehicle Speed Sensor "A”

DTC P0503 | Vehicle Speed Sensor ”A” Intermittent/
Erratic/High

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

TheNo. 1 vehiclespeedsensoroutputsa4  —pulse signalfor every revolution ofthe rotor shaft, whichis ro-
tated by the transmission output shaft via the driven gear. After this signal is converted into a more precise
rectangular waveform by the waveform shaping circuit inside the combination meter, it is then transmitted
to the engine control ECU. The engine control ECU determines the vehicle speed based on the frequency

of these pulse signals.
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU assumes that the vehicle is being driven when the engine RPM is more than 2,000
rpm andthe Park/Neutral Position (PNP) switch was turned OFF (for 10seconds). Ifthereis no signal from
the VSS when the vehicle is being driven, the engine control ECU interprets this as a malfunction in the VSS.
The engine control ECU illuminates the MIL and sets a DTC.
This monitor runs when all of following conditions are met for 10secondsormore.

. Engineiswarmed -up (Engine coolanttemperatureis20  °C (68 °F)ormore)

. Engine RPMis 2,000 rpm or more

. D shift position
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Readfreeze frame data usingthe hand

running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air

-heldtester. Freeze frame datarecords the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was

data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

—fuel ratiowaslean orrich, as well as other

1 Check operation of speedometer.

CHECK:

Drive the vehicle and check if the operation of the speedometer in the combination meter is normal.

HINT:

The vehicle speed is operating normally if the speedometer display is normal.
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Check speedometer circuit. See combination
meter troubleshooting.
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2Checkvoltage betweenterminal SPD and E 1 ofengine control ECU connector.

Engine ControlECU  SPD(+)

PREPARATION:

p a2 Connector A19629

406V

Turn the Wheel

AT7809

(@)  Shift the shift lever to neutral.

(b)  Jack up the rear wheel on one side.

(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the specified terminal of the E9
and E 10engine control ECU connectorwhenthe wheelis
turned slowly.

OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

SPD (E 10-17) - E1 (E9-1) Generated intermittently
HINT:
The output voltage should fluctuate up and down similarly to the
diagram on the left when the wheel is turned slowly.

tween combination meter and engine control

NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
ECU.

@

RM630E, page Fl -74).

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
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